Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5719.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Chief executive officer" means the chief executive officer of the council. (b) (a) "Council" means the prosecuting attorneys coordinating council. (b) "Executive secretary" means the executive secretary of the council. (c) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (d) (c) "Office" means the office of prosecuting attorneys coordination as created in section 3. Sec. 3. (1) The office of prosecuting attorneys coordination is created as an autonomous entity in the department. of attorney general. (2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the office shall exercise its statutory powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities independently of the department. The department shall provide support and coordinated services as requested by the office, including by providing personnel, budgeting, procurement, and other administrative support to the office sufficient to carry out its duties, powers, and responsibilities. (3) (2) The head of the office is the prosecuting attorneys coordinating council. (4) (3) The chief executive officer of the office is the executive secretary who shall must be appointed by the council, and who shall hold office during at the pleasure of the council. He The chief executive officer shall perform the functions and duties as may be assigned to him by the council. The council may employ other persons individuals as it deems necessary to implement the intent and purpose of this act. Sec. 4. (1) The council consists of 5 members selected as follows: (a) The attorney general, or his designated representative. (a) (b) The president of the prosecuting attorneys association Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan. (b) (c) One member appointed to the council for a 1-year term, to be elected by the prosecuting attorneys association Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan, who shall must be a prosecuting attorney from a county having a population of over more than 400,000 persons.individuals. (c) (d) One member appointed to the council for a 1-year term, to be elected by the prosecuting attorneys association Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan, who shall must be a prosecuting attorney from a county having a population of between 100,000 and 400,000 persons.individuals. (d) (e) One member appointed to the council for a 1-year term, to be elected by the prosecuting attorneys association Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan, who shall must be a prosecuting attorney from a county having a population under of less than 100,000 persons.individuals. (e) One member appointed to the council for a 1-year term, to be elected by the Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan, who must be a prosecuting attorney from a county having a population of less than 50,000 individuals. (2) A member shall must vacate his the member's appointment upon on termination of his the member's official position as a prosecuting attorney. or attorney general. A vacancy shall must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. A member appointed to fill a vacancy created other than by expiration of a term shall must be appointed for the unexpired term of the member who he the newly appointed member is to succeed in the same manner as the original appointment. Any member may be reappointed for additional terms. (3) The terms of the members first appointed shall begin on January 1 following the effective date of this act.